New York, session 2025-2026, S1628.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 301-b of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 9 to read as follows: 3 (9) Diesel and motor fuel used in the operation of cranes for off-road 4 use. For purposes of this paragraph, "cranes" include but are not limit- 5 ed to mobile cranes, hydraulic cranes, crawler cranes, floating cranes, 6 telescopic cranes, gantry cranes, or tower cranes. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01052-01-5